Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 23 Safety Awareness Programs

37-23-1.
Safety awareness program required.

All contractors performing work on municipal and state construction projects with a total project cost of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more, shall have an OSHA “ten (10) hour construction safety program” for their on-site employees. The training program shall utilize instructors trained by the occupational safety and health administration, using an OSHA approved curriculum. Graduates shall receive a card from the U.S. department of labor occupational safety and health administration certifying the successful completion of the training course.

Every person shall have a card issued by the U.S. department of labor occupational safety and health administration certifying their successful completion of the OSHA ten (10) hour training program as required by this section on their person at all times while work is actually being performed on municipal and state construction projects. No person shall transfer their card certifying their successful completion of the OSHA ten (10) hour training program to another person. Failure to comply with this section shall subject the holder to penalties prescribed by the director of the department of labor and training.

The director of the department of labor and training shall promulgate rules, regulations, and penalties to enforce the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 593, § 2.

37-23-2.
Board of safety awareness created.

There is hereby established, within the Division of Professional Regulation, a Board of Safety Awareness, hereinafter referred to as “the board”, which shall at all times consist of nine (9) qualified electors of the state, all of whom shall have successfully completed the OSHA ten (10) hour construction safety program.

Annually, on or before January 31st, the director of labor and training shall appoint a member or members of the board to succeed the member or members whose term is at that time expiring who shall serve for three (3) years or until his/her successor is appointed and qualified. Any vacancy, which may occur in the board from any cause, shall be filled by the director for the remainder of the unexpired term. In the interest of maintaining consistency, the nine (9) members initially appointed to the Board of Safety Awareness will serve staggered term as follows: the three (3) officers will serve a three (3) year term; three (3) members will serve a two (2) year term; and three (3) members will serve a one (1) year term.

The board shall elect from its membership a chairperson, who shall have obtained at least a minimum of the thirty (30) hour construction safety program as it pertains to the construction sector under OSHA regulations 1926.

The board shall also elect from its membership a vice-chairperson and a secretary, both of whom shall have successfully completed at least a minimum of the thirty (30) hour construction safety program as it pertains to the construction sector under OSHA regulations 1926.

The board shall advise and assist the division of professional regulation on promoting and promulgating such policies as may be necessary to improve safety on construction worksites subject to the approval of the director.

The board may recommend to the director of labor and training, the replacement of a member who misses three (3) consecutive regularly scheduled monthly meetings.

The final authority on all questions of procedure and parliamentary law not covered by the rules/bylaws of this board or by the Administrative Procedures Act of the State of Rhode Island shall be Robert’s Rules of Order.

There shall be a chief investigator for the division who shall have obtained at least a minimum successful completion of the thirty (30) hour construction safety program as it pertains to the construction sector under OSHA regulations 1926. He or she shall be appointed by the director of labor and training, upon recommendation from the board of safety awareness, and the position shall be in the classified service.

There shall be a secretary for the safety awareness section who is in the classified service.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 593, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 38.

37-23-3.
Definitions.

“On-site Employee” may be regarded as any private person or entity bound by a contractual agreement to provide goods or services to a contractor/developer who must physically enter the place where work is being performed or business being conducted; provided, however, this chapter shall not apply to sales representatives, vendors, or to any person, entity or corporation who delivers building materials and supplies or customized products to a construction site.

“Violator(s)” may include, but not be limited to, construction workers, contractors, project developers, site managers, and/or any other individual(s) working on a jobsite.

“Division” shall mean the division of professional regulation within the department of labor and training.

“Board” shall mean the board of safety awareness.

“Department” shall mean Department of Labor and Training.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 593, § 2.

37-23-4.
Exemptions.

The following individuals are exempt from the requirements of the OSHA ten (10) hour construction safety program:

Law enforcement officers dealing with traffic control and/or jobsite security;

All relevant federal, state and municipal government inspectors.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 593, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 38.

37-23-5.
Training program.

The Board of Safety Awareness has endorsed the Occupational Safety and Health Administration’s (OSHA) Outreach Training Program as the training program through which OSHA authorizes trainers to teach ten (10) hour and thirty (30) hour construction industry occupational safety and health standards, through which successful completion shall be documented.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 593, § 2.

37-23-6.
Work for which OSHA ten (10) hour construction safety program is required.

No person, firm, entity, or corporation shall enter into, engage in, solicit, advertise, bid for, or work on municipal and/or state construction projects with a total project cost of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more unless that person, firm, entity or corporation has an OSHA ten (10) hour construction safety program for their on-site employees.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 593, § 2.

37-23-7.
Inspection and right of entry.

Authorized staff of the department shall have the right and authority to enter, during times at which work is actually being performed all municipal and state construction projects for the purpose of ascertaining compliance.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 593, § 2.

37-23-8.
Investigation and prosecution of violations.

Authorized staff of the department shall enforce all provisions of law relative to the certification of the successful completion of the OSHA ten (10) hour construction safety program. Whenever a complaint is made to the director that the provisions of this chapter are being violated, the director may issue an order to cease and desist from said violation. The director shall thereupon order an administrative penalty on any person, firm, entity or corporation for any violation of the provisions of this chapter, in the amount of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than nine hundred and fifty dollars ($950) per offense on each day in which a violation occurs, or the complaint may be dismissed in accordance with the recommendations.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 593, § 2.

37-23-9.
Subpoena of a witness.

The department of labor and training shall have the power to subpoena and bring before it or the board of safety awareness any witness to give testimony either orally or by deposition, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 593, § 2.

37-23-10.
Administration of oaths.

The director of the department of labor and training and his/her designees shall have the authority to administer oaths to witnesses at a hearing, which the department has authorized by law to conduct, and any other oaths authorized or administered by the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 593, § 2.

37-23-11.
Appeals.

Any person, firm, entity or corporation who has been assessed a penalty may appeal such to the director within twenty (20) days of receipt of the cease and desist order. The director of the department of labor and training shall refer said appeal to the board. The board, upon completion of any appeal held on a verified complaint, shall present to the director of labor and training, a written report of its findings and recommendations. The director may accept or reject, in whole or in part, the recommended order of the board. The order of the director is final, and a copy of the order shall be immediately served upon the person, firm, or corporation assessed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 593, § 2.

37-23-12.
Penalties for nonpayment.

Any person, firm, entity, or corporation who has violated chapter 23 of title 37, whether duly registered with the office of the secretary of state or not, and has been assessed a fine by the director of labor and training, is hereby required to submit penalties due to the department of labor and training, within thirty (30) days of notice of the penalty, or the director of labor and training shall have the power to institute injunction proceedings in superior court.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 593, § 2.